Utah statutes.
10-6-131.   Transfer of balances in special funds.

Whenever the necessity for maintaining any special fund of a city has ceased to exist and a balance remains in the fund, the governing body shall authorize the transfer of the balance to the fund balance account in the general fund of the city, except that:

(1)  Any balance remaining in a special assessment fund and any unrequired balance in its special improvements guaranty fund shall be treated in the manner provided in Sections 11-42-413 and 11-42-701;

(2)  Any balance remaining in a capital improvements or capital projects fund shall be transferred to the appropriate debt service fund or other fund as the bond ordinance may require and otherwise to the fund balance account in the general fund;

(3)  Whenever any balance held in a trust fund for a specific purpose, other than a cemetery perpetual care trust fund, is to be transferred because its original purpose or restriction has ceased to exist, a public hearing shall be held in the manner provided in Sections 10-6-113 and 10-6-114. The published notice shall invite those persons who contributed to the fund to appear at the hearing. If the governing body determines the fund balance amounts are refundable to the original contributors, a 30 day period following the hearing shall be allowed for persons having an interest in the fund to file with the governing body a verified claim only for the amount of each claimant's contributions. Any claim not so filed shall be forever barred. Any balance remaining, after refunds to eligible contributors, shall be transferred to the fund balance account in the general fund of the city; and

(4)  Whenever the governing body decides, in conformity with applicable laws and ordinances, that the need for continued maintenance of its cemetery perpetual care trust fund no longer exists, it may transfer the balance in such fund to the capital improvements fund for expenditure for land, buildings and major improvements to be used exclusively for cemetery purposes.



Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

